Maine, session 132, LD620.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
DEFENSE, VETERANS AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT, DEPARTMENT
OF
Administration - Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management 0109
Initiative: Provides ongoing appropriations to organizations in the State conducting
outreach and providing support services to active duty military members and their families
who are transitioning to civilian life.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $200,000 $200,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $200,000 $200,000